Washington statutes.
RCW 18.227.060

Uniform disciplinary act—Application.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs uncertified practice, the issuance and denial of certification, and the discipline of persons certified under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplinary authority under this chapter.

[ 2023 c 270 s 7.]